Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.342

Washington technology solutions revolving account—Independent technical and financial analysis of proposed projects by the board.

(1) The Washington technology solutions revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from agency fees and charges for services collected from public agencies must be deposited into the account. The account must be used for the:

(a) Acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, and services; and

(b) Payment of salaries, wages, and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, maintenance, operation, and administration of: (i) Information services; (ii) telecommunications; (iii) systems; (iv) software; (v) supplies; and (vi) equipment, including the payment of principal and interest on debt by the agency and other users as determined by the office of financial management.

(2) The director or the director's designee, with the approval of the technology services board, is authorized to expend up to one million dollars per fiscal biennium for the technology services board to conduct independent technical and financial analysis of proposed information technology projects.

(3) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Expenditures for the strategic planning and policy component of the agency are subject to appropriation.

[ 2024 c 54 s 14; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 501.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.